tr: Yer elması çeşidi: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Diğer
fi: Maa-artisokkalajike: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Muu
zh-TW: 菊芋品種: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; 其他
th: พันธุ์ซันโชก: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; อื่นๆ
el: Ποικιλία τοπιναμπούρ: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Άλλο
nl: Aardpeer variëteit: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Rode Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; Witte Fuseau; Overig
sv: Jordärtskockssort: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Övrigt
vi: Giống củ atiso Jerusalem: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Khác
es: Variedad de alcachofa de Jerusalén: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Otro
ro-RO: Soi de topinambur: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Altele
bg-BG: Вид/сорт на земната ябълка: Клиъруотър; Джуджевиден сънрей; Фузо; Пасамакуоди; Червено Фузо; Рингер; Стампийд; Суперклъстер; Бяло Фузо; Друго
da: Jordskokkevariant: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Andet
it: Varietà di topinambur: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Altro
en: Sunchoke variety: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Other
pt-BR: Alcachofra-de-jerusalém variedade: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Outros
nb: Jordskokksort: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Annet
fr: Variété de topinambour: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Autre
ru: Сорт топинамбура: Клируотер; Дворф санрей; Фузо; Пассамакводди; Красный фузо; Рингер; Стампид; Суперкластер; Белый фузо; Другой
cs: Odrůda slunečnice topinambur: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Jiné
zh-CN: 洋姜品种: 克利尔沃特; 矮生太阳光芒; 纺锤; 帕萨马科迪; 红弗索; 铃声; 奔腾; 超星团; 白弗索; 其他
ja: キクイモの種類: クリアウォーター; ドワーフサンレイ; フューソー; パサマクォディ; レッドフューソー; リンガー; スタンピード; スーパークラスター; ホワイトフューソー; その他
hr-HR: Sorta čičoke: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Ostalo
sk-SK: Odroda topinamburu: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Iné
sl-SI: Sorta topinamburja: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Drugo
de: Topinambursorte: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Sonstige
ko: 돼지감자 품종: 클리어워터; 드워프 선레이; 푸소; 파사마쿼디; 레드 푸소; 링거; 스탬피드; 슈퍼클러스터; 화이트 푸소; 기타
pl: Odmiana topinamburu: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Inne
lt-LT: Topinambų veislė: „Clearwater“; „Dwarf Sunray“; „Fuseau“; „Passamaquoddy“; „Red Fuseau“; „Ringer“; „Stampede“; „Supercluster“; „White Fuseau“; Kita
hu: Csicsókafajta: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Egyéb
pt-PT: Variedade de tupinambo: Clearwater; Dwarf Sunray; Fuseau; Passamaquoddy; Red Fuseau; Ringer; Stampede; Supercluster; White Fuseau; Outro